Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.930

Continuation of rules adopted pursuant to repealed sections—Adoption, amendment or repeal.

The repeal of sections 15.48.010 through 15.48.260 and 15.48.900, chapter 11, Laws of 1961 and RCW 15.48.010 through 15.48.260 and 15.48.900 and the enactment of this 1969 act shall not be deemed to have repealed any regulations adopted under the provisions of sections 15.48.010 through 15.48.260 and 15.48.900, chapter 11, Laws of 1961 and RCW 15.48.010 through 15.48.260 and 15.48.900, and in effect immediately prior to such repeal and not inconsistent with the provisions of this 1969 act. For the purpose of this 1969 act, it shall be deemed that such rules have been adopted under the provisions of this 1969 act pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, as enacted or hereafter amended concerning the adoption of rules. Any amendment or repeal of such rules after July 1, 1969, shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW (Administrative Procedure Act) as enacted or hereafter amended, concerning the adoption of rules.

[ 1969 c 63 s 52.]